Louisiana, session 2026, HB900.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 38 of Title 48 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, to be
comprised of R.S. 48:2251 and 2252, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 38. DAMAGE RECOVERY FUND
§2251. Recovery fund; creation
The department shall establish a fund for the collection of funds recovered
by the state for damage to state property which occurs from traffic accidents or other
accidents that cause damage to state property on state highways.
§2252. Use of funds
A. Funds collected under this Chapter shall be utilized by the department to
repair the damage in the district in which it was caused or to refund the payment for
repairs from damage caused by traffic accidents already paid by the district or by the
local governing authority.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1235 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 900
B. The provisions of this Chapter shall exclude the costs expended by the
department to recover the funds from the responsible party who caused the damage
to the state property.